North Dakota statutes. TITLE 57 Taxation
CHAPTER 57-02 General Property Assessment
57-02-08.
Property exempt from taxation. [Effective for taxable years beginning before January 1, 2022]

All property described in this section to the extent herein limited shall be exempt from taxation:

All property owned exclusively by the United States except any such property which the state and its political subdivisions are authorized by the laws of the United States to tax.

All property owned by this state, but no lands contracted to be sold by the state shall be exempt.

All property belonging to any political subdivision and the leasehold interest in property leased by a political subdivision from another political subdivision.

Property of Indians if the title of that property is inalienable without the consent of the United States secretary of the interior.

All lands used exclusively for burying grounds or cemeteries.

All property belonging to schools, academies, colleges, or other institutions of learning, not otherwise used with a view to profit, and all dormitories and boarding halls, including the land upon which they are situated, owned and managed by any religious corporation for educational or charitable purposes for the use of students in attendance upon any educational institution, if such dormitories and boarding halls are not managed or used for the purpose of making a profit over and above the cost of maintenance and operation.

Repealed by S.L. 2011, ch. 445, § 2.

All buildings belonging to institutions of public charity, including public hospitals and nursing homes licensed pursuant to section 23-16-01 under the control of religious or charitable institutions, used wholly or in part for public charity, together with the land actually occupied by such institutions not leased or otherwise used with a view to profit. The exemption provided by this subsection includes any dormitory, dwelling, or residential-type structure, together with necessary land on which such structure is located, owned by a religious or charitable organization recognized as tax exempt under section 501(c)(3) of the United States Internal Revenue Code which is occupied by members of said organization who are subject to a religious vow of poverty and devote and donate substantially all of their time to the religious or charitable activities of the owner.

The land and any buildings on a parcel on which a church building is located, and which is owned by a religious corporation or organization and used predominantly for the religious purposes of the organization, must be deemed to be property used exclusively for religious purposes, and exempt from taxation. The land and any buildings on a parcel contiguous to the parcel on which a church building is located, which is owned by a religious corporation or organization, is exempt from taxation if any building located on the parcel is used predominantly for religious purposes.

If the parsonage and residence of the bishop, priest, rector, minister, or other clergy is located on property owned by the religious corporation or organization, which is not adjacent to the church, that residence, with usual outbuildings and land on which it is located, up to two acres [.81 hectare], must be deemed to be property used exclusively for religious purposes and is exempt from taxation.

Up to twenty acres of undeveloped land owned by a religious corporation or organization for the purpose of a future church building or buildings is exempt from taxation. This exemption expires ten years after the taxable year in which the property was acquired by the religious corporation or organization if construction improvements to accommodate a church building have not commenced.

The exemption for a building used for the religious purposes of the owner continues to be in effect if the building in whole, or in part, is rented to another otherwise tax-exempt corporation or organization, provided no profit is realized from the rent.

Property of an agricultural fair association duly incorporated for the purpose of holding agricultural fairs, and not conducted for the profit of any of its members or stockholders; provided, that all property described in this subsection shall be subject to taxation for the cost of fire protection services furnished by any municipal corporation in which said property is located.

Property owned by lodges, chapters, commanderies, consistories, farmers’ clubs, commercial clubs, and like organizations, and associations, grand or subordinate, not organized for profit, and used by them for places of meeting and for conducting their business and ceremonies, and all property owned by any fraternity, sorority, or organization of college students if such property is used exclusively for such purposes; provided, further, that any portion of such premises not exclusively used for places of meeting and conducting the business and ceremonies of such organization shall be subject to taxation.

Repealed by S.L. 1983, ch. 595, § 3.

All land used as a public park or monument ground belonging to any military organization, and not used for gain.

The armory, and land or lots upon which situated, owned by a regiment, battalion, or company of the North Dakota national guard, and used for military purposes by such organization.

All farm structures and improvements located on agricultural lands.

This subsection must be construed to exempt farm buildings and improvements only, and may not be construed to exempt from taxation industrial plants, or structures of any kind not used or intended for use as a part of a farm plant, or as a farm residence.

“Farm buildings and improvements” includes a greenhouse or other building used primarily for the growing of horticultural or nursery products from seed, cuttings, or roots, if not used on more than an occasional basis for a showroom for the retail sale of horticultural or nursery products. A greenhouse or building used primarily for display and sale of grown horticultural or nursery products is not a farm building or improvement.

Any structure or improvement used primarily in connection with a retail or wholesale business other than farming, any structure or improvement located on platted land within the corporate limits of a city, any structure or improvement used by a manufacturing facility as defined in section 19-24.1-01, or any structure or improvement located on railroad operating property subject to assessment under chapter 57-05 is not exempt under this subsection. For purposes of this paragraph, “business other than farming” includes processing to produce a value-added physical or chemical change in an agricultural commodity beyond the ordinary handling of that commodity by a farmer prior to sale.

The following factors may not be considered in application of the exemption under this subsection:

Whether the farmer grows or purchases feed for animals raised on the farm.

Whether animals being raised on the farm are owned by the farmer.

Whether the farm’s replacement animals are produced on the farm.

Whether the farmer is engaged in contract feeding of animals on the farm.

It is the intent of the legislative assembly that this exemption as applied to a residence must be strictly construed and interpreted to exempt only a residence that is situated on a farm and which is occupied or used by a person who is a farmer and that the exemption may not be applied to property which is occupied or used by a person who is not a farmer. For purposes of this subdivision:

“Farm” means a single tract or contiguous tracts of agricultural land containing a minimum of ten acres [4.05 hectares] and for which the farmer, actually farming the land or engaged in the raising of livestock or other similar operations normally associated with farming and ranching, has annual gross income from farming activities which is sixty-six percent or more of annual gross income, including gross income of a spouse if married, during any of the two preceding calendar years.

“Farmer” means an individual who normally devotes the major portion of time to the activities of producing products of the soil, with the exception of marijuana grown under chapter 19-24.1; poultry; livestock; or dairy farming in such products’ unmanufactured state and has received annual gross income from farming activities which is sixty-six percent or more of annual gross income, including gross income of a spouse if married, during any of the two preceding calendar years. For purposes of this paragraph, “farmer” includes a:

“Beginning farmer”, which means an individual who has begun occupancy and operation of a farm within the two preceding calendar years; who normally devotes the major portion of time to the activities of producing products of the soil, poultry, livestock, or dairy farming in such products’ unmanufactured state; and who does not have a history of farm income from farm operation for each of the two preceding calendar years.

“Retired farmer”, which means an individual who is retired because of illness or age and who at the time of retirement owned and occupied as a farmer the residence in which the person lives and for which the exemption is claimed.

“Surviving spouse of a farmer”, which means the surviving spouse of an individual who is deceased, who at the time of death owned and occupied as a farmer the residence in which the surviving spouse lives and for which the exemption is claimed. The exemption under this subparagraph expires at the end of the fifth taxable year after the taxable year of death of an individual who at the time of death was an active farmer. The exemption under this subparagraph applies for as long as the residence is continuously occupied by the surviving spouse of an individual who at the time of death was a retired farmer.

“Gross income” means gross income as defined under the federal Internal Revenue Code.

Gross income from farming activities means gross income from

When exemption is claimed under this subdivision for a residence, the occupant of the residence who it is claimed is a farmer shall provide to the assessor for the year or years specified by the assessor a written statement in which it is stated that sixty-six percent or more of the gross income of that occupant, and spouse if married and both spouses occupy the residence, was, or was not, gross income from farming activities. The individual claiming the exemption also shall provide to the assessor, on a form prescribed by the tax commissioner, the necessary income information to demonstrate eligibility. Any income information provided to the assessor regarding eligibility for an exemption claimed under this subdivision is a confidential record.

For purposes of this section, “livestock” includes “nontraditional livestock” as defined in section 36-01-00.1.

A farmer operating a bed and breakfast facility in the farm residence occupied by that farmer is entitled to the exemption under this section for that residence if the farmer and the residence would qualify for exemption under this section except for the use of the residence as a bed and breakfast facility.

Property now owned, or hereafter acquired, by a corporation organized, or hereafter created, under the laws of this state for the purpose of promoting athletic and educational needs and uses at any state educational institution in this state, and not organized for profit.

Moneys and credits, including shares of corporate stock and membership interests in limited liability companies, except moneyed capital which is so invested or used as to come into direct competition with money invested in bank stock.

Repealed by S.L. 1983, ch. 595, § 3.

Repealed by S.L. 1983, ch. 595, § 3.

Fixtures, buildings, and improvements up to the amount of valuation specified, when owned and occupied as a homestead, as hereinafter defined, by any of the following persons:

A paraplegic disabled veteran of the United States armed forces or any veteran who has been awarded specially adapted housing by the department of veterans’ affairs, or the unremarried surviving spouse if such veteran is deceased, for the first one hundred twenty thousand dollars of true and full valuation of the fixtures, buildings, and improvements.

Any permanently and totally disabled person who is permanently confined to use of a wheelchair, or, if deceased, the unremarried surviving spouse of a permanently and totally disabled person. If the spouse of a permanently and totally disabled person owns the homestead or if it is jointly owned by them, the same reduction in assessed valuation applies as long as both reside thereon. The provisions of this subdivision do not reduce the liability for special assessments levied upon the homestead. The phrase “permanently confined to use of a wheelchair” means that the person cannot walk with the assistance of crutches or any other device and will never be able to do so and that a physician selected by the local governing board has so certified.

Repealed by S.L. 1983, ch. 595, § 3.

All or any part of fixtures, buildings, and improvements upon any nonfarmland up to a taxable valuation of seven thousand two hundred dollars, owned and occupied as a home by a blind person. Residential homes owned by the spouse of a blind person, or jointly owned by a blind person and spouse, shall also be exempt within the limits of this subsection as long as the blind person resides in the home. For purposes of this subsection, a blind person is defined as one who is totally blind, has visual acuity of not more than 20/200 in the better eye with correction, or whose vision is limited in field so that the widest diameter subtends an angle no greater than twenty degrees. The exemption provided by this subsection extends to the entire building classified as residential, and owned and occupied as a residence by a person who qualifies for the exemption as long as the building contains no more than two apartments or rental units which are leased.

All, or any portion of structural improvements other than paving and surfacing to land used exclusively for the business of operating an automobile parking lot within a city open for general public patronage. If a portion of the structure is exempt from taxation as being open for general public patronage, the amount of such exemption shall be computed by determining the value of the public parking area in proportion to the total value of the structure.

Repealed by S.L. 1983, ch. 595, § 3.

All personal property is exempt except:

Personal property of entities, other than railroads, required by section 4 of article X of the Constitution of North Dakota to be assessed by the state board of equalization.

Any property that is subjected to a tax which is imposed in lieu of ad valorem taxes.

Any particular kind or class of personal property, including mobile homes or housetrailers, that is subjected to a tax imposed pursuant to any other provision of law.

Fixtures, buildings, and improvements when owned and occupied as a homestead, as hereinafter defined, by a paraplegic disabled person, or if the person is deceased the unremarried spouse, if the income from all sources of the person and spouse, or if the person is deceased the income from all sources of the unremarried surviving spouse, in the calendar year prior to the year for which the exemption is claimed did not exceed the maximum amount of income provided in section 57-02-08.1 for receiving a homestead credit under that section. To obtain the exemption for the first time, a certificate from a medical doctor who is approved by the board of county commissioners, accompanied by an affidavit, showing the facts herein required and a description of the property, must be filed with the county auditor. The affidavit and accompanying certificate must be opened to public inspection. Any person claiming the exemption for any year after the first year shall furnish to the assessor or other assessment officials when requested to do so any information which the person believes will support the claim for the exemption for any subsequent year. For purposes of this subsection, “homestead” has the meaning provided in section 47-18-01 except that it also applies to any person who otherwise qualifies under the provisions of this subsection whether or not the person is the head of a family. The board of county commissioners is hereby authorized to cancel the unpaid taxes for any year in which the person has held title to the exempt property.

Installations, machinery, and equipment of systems in new or existing buildings or structures, designed to provide heating or cooling or to produce electrical or mechanical power, or any combination of these, or to store any of these, by utilization of solar, wind, or geothermal energy; provided, that if the solar, wind, or geothermal energy device is part of a system which uses other means of energy, only that portion of the total system directly attributable to solar, wind, or geothermal energy shall be exempt. Provided, however, that any exemptions granted by this subsection shall be valid for a five-year period following installation of any such system and apply only to locally assessed property. For the purposes of this subsection, solar or wind energy devices shall have the meaning provided in section 57-38-01.8 and geothermal energy device means a system or mechanism or series of mechanisms designed to provide heating or cooling or to produce electrical or mechanical power, or any combination of these, by a method which extracts or converts the energy naturally occurring beneath the earth’s surface in rock structures, water, or steam.

All fixtures, buildings, and improvements owned by any cooperative or nonprofit corporation organized under the laws of this state and used by it to furnish potable water to its members and customers for uses other than the irrigation of agricultural land.

Property to which title is held by a city pursuant to chapter 40-57 which is leased to an entity described in subsection 8 and used by the entity as provided in subsection 8 or subleased to a public school district for educational purposes; provided, that the entity is qualified as an exempt organization under section 501(c)(3) of the United States Internal Revenue Code of 1954, as amended.

Property, but not including property used for residential purposes, owned by an organization described in subsection 9 and leased to a public school district for educational purposes; provided, that the property had previously been owned and occupied by the organization for an exempt purpose described in subsection 9 for a period of at least five years.

All group homes owned by nonprofit corporations, not organized with a view to profit and recognized as tax exempt under section 501(c)(3) of the United States Internal Revenue Code [26 U.S.C. 501(c)(3)], including those for persons with developmental disabilities as defined in section 25-01.2-01, and the real property upon which they are located during the period in which the group homes are under construction or in a remodeling phase and while they are used as group homes. For the purposes of this subsection, the term “group home” means a community-based residential home which provides room and board, personal care, habilitation services, or supervision in a family environment, and which, once established is licensed by the appropriate North Dakota licensing authority.

Minerals in place in the earth which at the time of removal from the earth are then subject to taxes imposed under chapter 57-51, 57-61, or 57-65.

Property used for athletic or recreational activities when owned by a political subdivision and leased to a nonprofit corporation organized for the purpose of promoting public athletic or recreational activities.

Any building located on land owned by the state if the building is used at least in part for academic or research purposes by students and faculty of a state institution of higher education.

Up to one hundred fifty thousand dollars of the true and full value of all new single-family and condominium and townhouse residential property, exclusive of the land on which it is situated, is exempt from taxation for the first two taxable years after the taxable year in which construction is completed and the residence is owned and occupied for the first time if all of the following conditions are met:

The governing body of the city, for property within city limits, or the governing body of the county, for property outside city limits, has approved the exemption of the property by resolution. A resolution adopted under this subsection may be rescinded or amended at any time. The governing body of the city or county may limit or impose conditions upon exemptions under this subsection, including limitations on the time during which an exemption is allowed.

Special assessments and taxes on the property upon which the residence is situated are not delinquent.

The governing body of the city, for property within city limits, or of the county, for property outside city limits, may grant a property tax exemption for the portion of fixtures, buildings, and improvements, used primarily to provide early childhood services by a corporation, limited liability company, or organization licensed under chapter 50-11.1 or used primarily as an adult day care center. The exemption applies regardless of whether the early childhood or adult day care service provider owns the property. However, this exemption is not available for property used as a residence.

A pollution abatement improvement. As used in this subsection, “pollution abatement improvement” means property, exclusive of land and improvements to the land such as ditching, surfacing, and leveling, that is:

Part of an agricultural or industrial facility which is used for or has for its ultimate purpose the prevention, control, monitoring, reducing, or eliminating of pollution by treating, pretreating, stabilizing, isolating, collecting, holding, controlling, measuring, or disposing of waste contaminants; or

Part of an agricultural or industrial facility and required to comply with local, state, or federal environmental quality laws, rules, regulations, or standards.

The exemption under this subsection applies only to that portion of the valuation of property attributable to the pollution abatement improvement on which construction or installation was commenced after December 31, 1992, and does not apply to the valuation of any property that is not a necessary component of the pollution abatement improvement. The governing body of the city, for property within city limits, or the governing board of the county, for property outside city limits, shall determine whether the property proposed for exemption is a pollution abatement improvement and may grant an exemption for the pollution abatement improvement based upon the requirements of this subsection.

Property owned by the state upon which payments in lieu of property taxes are made by the state.

Notwithstanding any other law, all property, including any possessory interest therein, relating to any waterworks, mains, and water distribution system leased to the state, or any agency or institution of the state, or to a private entity pursuant to subsection 5 of section 40-33-01, subsection 12 of section 61-24.5-09, or subsection 23 of section 61-35-12, which property is operated by, or providing services to, a municipality or other political subdivision or agency of the state, or its citizens.

Notwithstanding any other law, all property, including any possessory interest therein, relating to any sewage systems and facilities for the collection, treatment, purification, and disposal in a sanitary manner of sewage leased to the state, or any agency or institution of the state, or to a private entity pursuant to section 40-34-19 or subsection 23 of section 61-35-12, which property is operated by, or providing services to, a municipality or other political subdivision or agency of the state, or its citizens.

Notwithstanding any other law, all property, including any possessory interest therein, leased to a private entity pursuant to section 54-01-27, which property is operated by, or providing services to, the state or its citizens.

New single-family residential property, exclusive of the land on which it is situated, is exempt from assessment for the taxable year in which construction began and the next two taxable years, if the property remains owned by the builder, remains unoccupied, and all of the following conditions are met:

The governing body of the city, for property within city limits, or the governing body of the county, for property outside city limits, has approved the exemption of property under this subsection by resolution. A resolution adopted under this subsection may be rescinded or amended at any time. The governing body of the city or county may limit or impose conditions upon exemptions under this subsection, including limitations on the time during which an exemption is allowed.

Special assessments and taxes on the property upon which the residence is situated are not delinquent.

A builder is eligible for exemption of no more than ten properties under this subsection in a taxable year within each jurisdiction that has approved the exemption under this subsection. For purposes of this subsection, “builder” includes an individual who builds that individual’s own residence.

All residential rental property, inclusive of land and administrative and auxiliary buildings, used as affordable housing shall be exempt from taxation for the property’s period of affordability.

The property is exempt under this section if the housing finance agency certifies to the county director of tax equalization that on January 1, 2013, or thereafter, the residential rental property complies with the following:

The property is subject to and in compliance with a land use restriction agreement that enumerates the mandatory income and rent restrictions;

The property is owned by a qualified nonprofit entity, as defined in section 42 of the Internal Revenue Code [26 U.S.C. 42]. If under a partnership agreement or other legally enforceable instrument, a for-profit entity, such as a limited partner, has an ownership interest in the property, then the agreement must provide that the nonprofit entity must have the right of first refusal in any transfer of the ownership interest in the property. The partnership agreement or other legally enforceable instrument also must provide that any transfer of the ownership interest by the for-profit entity must be without financial gain; and

The general partner or other ownership entity is owned or controlled by a nonprofit entity or a political subdivision.

For projects beginning after December 31, 2012, the exemption begins for the first taxable year after the owners of the rental property receive a building permit from the local jurisdiction in which the affordable housing residential rental property will be located.

If part of the residential rental property is not eligible to receive assistance through local, state, or federal affordable housing programs, the exemption under this section is calculated by dividing the number of income and rent-restricted units by the total number of rental units.

In lieu of the ad valorem taxes that would otherwise be assessed, the project owners shall make a payment equal to five percent of the balance of the total annual rents collected during the preceding calendar year, minus the utility costs for the property paid by the owner of the property.

If an affordable housing rental property fails to comply with the requirements of this section, or fails to comply with rent and household income restrictions under a local, state, or federal affordable housing program, on or before March fifteen of each calendar year, the housing finance agency shall notify the director of tax equalization and the state supervisor of assessments that the property is no longer eligible for the exemption.

For the purposes of this subsection, “affordable housing” includes property eligible for or receiving assistance through a local, state, or federal affordable housing program and in which rent and household income restrictions apply, and which is owned by nonprofit entities organized for the purpose of providing affordable housing. Affordable housing is limited to residential rental property owned by or with a controlling ownership or management interest by an organization organized and operated exclusively for exempt purposes set forth in section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code [26 U.S.C. 501(c)(3)].

Provided, further, that if any such organization as contemplated by this subsection is licensed for the sale of alcoholic beverages as defined by the statutes of the state of North Dakota, such portion of such premises where such alcoholic beverages are consumed or sold shall be deemed not to be so used exclusively for conduct of its business and meeting if such beverages are sold at a profit.

Provided, further, that if food other than that served at lodge functions and banquets and food sold or consumed in any fraternity or sorority house, is sold at a profit on the premises, that portion of the premises where such food is sold at a profit shall be deemed not to be used exclusively for places of meeting or conducting the business and ceremonies of such organization; provided, that all property described in this subsection shall be subject to taxation for the cost of fire protection services furnished by any municipal corporation in which said property is located.

farming as defined for purposes of determining if an individual is a farmer eligible to use the special estimated income tax payment rules for farmers under section 6654 of the federal Internal Revenue Code [26 U.S.C. 6654].

Any person claiming an exemption under this subsection for the first time shall file with the county auditor an affidavit showing the facts herein required and a description of the property. The affidavit must be open for public inspection. A person thereafter shall furnish to the assessor or other assessment officials when requested to do so any information that is believed will support the claim for exemption for a subsequent year.

For purposes of this subsection, and except as otherwise provided in this subsection, “homestead” has the meaning provided in section 47-18-01 except that it also applies to any person who otherwise qualifies under the provisions of this subsection whether or not the person is the head of a family. The board of county commissioners is hereby authorized to cancel the unpaid taxes for any year in which the qualifying owner has held title to the exempt property.

Source:

Pol. C. 1877, ch. 28, § 2; R.C. 1895, § 1177; S.L. 1897, ch. 126, § 5; R.C. 1899, § 1180; S.L. 1901, ch. 152, § 1; 1901, ch. 160, §§ 1 to 4; R.C. 1905, §§ 1484, 1485; S.L. 1907, ch. 218, § 1; 1911, ch. 290, § 1; 1913, ch. 280, § 1; C.L. 1913, §§ 2078, 2079; S.L. 1915, ch. 255, § 1; 1917, ch. 230, § 1; 1919, ch. 223, § 1; 1919 Sp., ch. 62, § 1; 1921, ch. 122, § 1; 1923, ch. 307, § 1; 1923, ch. 308, § 1; 1925 Supp., §§ 2078, 2078a3; S.L. 1929, ch. 230, § 1; 1929, ch. 246, § 1; 1931, ch. 295, § 1; 1931, ch. 296, § 1; 1935, ch. 224, § 2; 1941, ch. 270, § 5; 1941, ch. 282, § 3; R.C. 1943, § 57-0208; S.L. 1955, ch. 315, § 1; 1957, ch. 356, § 1; 1957 Supp., § 57-0208; S.L. 1959, ch. 382, § 1; 1959, ch. 383, § 1; 1961, ch. 343, § 1; 1961, ch. 344, § 1; 1961, ch. 345, § 1; 1961, ch. 357, § 10; 1963, ch. 377, §§ 1, 2; 1965, ch. 387, § 1; 1967, ch. 417, § 2; 1967, ch. 418, § 1; 1969, ch. 528, § 1; 1971, ch. 533, § 2; 1971, ch. 534, § 3; 1971, ch. 535, § 1; 1971, ch. 536, § 1; 1973, ch. 445, § 1; 1973, ch. 446, § 1; 1973, ch. 447, § 1; 1975, ch. 505, § 1; 1975, ch. 506, § 1; 1975, ch. 507, §§ 1, 2; 1975, ch. 508, § 1; 1977, ch. 508, § 1; 1977, ch. 509, § 1; 1979, ch. 588, § 1; 1981, ch. 555, § 1; 1981, ch. 556, §§ 1, 2; 1981, ch. 557, § 1; 1981, ch. 558, § 1; 1981, ch. 559, § 1; 1981, ch. 560, § 1; 1981, ch. 561, § 1; 1983, ch. 593, § 35; 1983, ch. 595, §§ 2, 3; 1983, ch. 596, § 1; 1983, ch. 597, §§ 1, 2; 1983, ch. 598, § 2; 1983, ch. 599, § 1; 1983, ch. 600, § 1; 1983, C. 601, S. 1; 1985, ch. 600, § 1; 1985, ch. 601, §§ 1, 2; 1985, ch. 602, § 1; 1985, ch. 603, § 1; 1985, ch. 612, § 1; 1987, ch. 669, § 1; 1987, ch. 670, § 1; 1989, ch. 690, § 1; 1989, ch. 691, § 1; 1989, ch. 692, § 1; 1991 Sp., ch. 888, § 1; 1993, ch. 54, § 106; 1993, ch. 408, § 2; 1993, ch. 542, § 1; 1993, ch. 543, § 1; 1995, ch. 546, § 1; 1995, ch. 547, § 1; 1997, ch. 475, § 1; 1997, ch. 476, § 1; 1997, ch. 477, § 1; 1999, ch. 488, § 1; 1999, ch. 489, § 1; 1999, ch. 490, § 1; 1999, ch. 491, § 1; 1999, ch. 503, § 11; 2003, ch. 342, § 13; 2005, ch. 544, § 2; 2007, ch. 499, § 1; 2007, ch. 504, § 3; 2009, ch. 524, § 1; 2009, ch. 525, § 1; 2009, ch. 526, § 1; 2009, ch. 527, § 1; 2009, ch. 529, § 2; 2011, ch. 486, § 1; 2011, ch. 445, §§ 1 , 2; 2011, ch. 444, § 1; 2011, ch. 443, § 1; 2013, ch. 441, § 1; 2013, ch. 440, §§ 1 , 2; 2015, ch. 436, § 1, eff for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2014; 2017, ch. 171, §§
3, 4, effective April 18, 2017; 2019 ch. 474, § 1, eff for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2019; 2019 ch. 473, § 1, eff for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2019; 2021 ch. 283, §§ 9, 10, August 1, 2021; 2021, ch. 458, § 1, 2021 ch. 458, § 1, eff for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2020, effective January 1, 2021; 2021, ch. 460, § 1, eff for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2020.

Note.

Section 57-02-08 was amended 3 times by the 2021 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 1 of Chapter 458, Session Laws 2021, House Bill 1471; Section 1 of Chapter 460, Session Laws 2021, Senate Bill 2202; and Section 1 of Chapter 459, Session Laws 2021, Senate Bill 2041.

Section 57-02-08 was amended 2 times by the 2019 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to

Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 1 of Chapter 474, Session Laws 2019, Senate Bill 2278; and Section 1 of Chapter 473, Session Laws 2019, Senate Bill 2360.

Section 57-02-08 was amended 2 times by the 2017 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to

Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 4 of Chapter 171, Session Laws 2017, Senate Bill 2344; and Section 3 of Chapter 171, Session Laws 2017, Senate Bill 2344.

Section 2 of chapter 441, S.L. 2013 provides: “

RETROACTIVE APPLICATION.

This Act is retroactively effective and applies for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2010. The board of county commissioners may abate or refund taxes under this Act on its own motion or upon application of a property owner under chapter 57-23.”

Cross-References.

Airport authority property and income, see N.D.C.C. § 2-06-18.

Electric generation, distribution and transmission taxes; taxes in lieu of property taxes, see N.D.C.C. § 57-33.2-05.

Financial institutions’ lieu tax, see N.D.C.C. § 57-35.3-04.

Condominium property, application of exemptions against, see N.D.C.C. § 47-04.1-13.

Constitutional authorization, see Const., art. X, § 5.

Deposits in Bank of North Dakota, see N.D.C.C. § 6-09-10.

Higher educational institutions, building bonds, see N.D.C.C. § 15-55-02.

Housing authority bonds and property, see N.D.C.C. §§ 23-11-21, 23-11-29.

Improvements to buildings, see N.D.C.C. ch. 57-02.2.

Industrial development, exemptions for new industries, see N.D.C.C. ch. 40-57.1.

Institutional holding associations, see N.D.C.C. § 15-17-06.

Insurance guaranty associations, see N.D.C.C. ch. 26.1-42.1.

International Peace Garden land, see N.D.C.C. § 55-05-03.

Motor vehicle registration fees in lieu of tax, see N.D.C.C. § 39-04-38.

Municipal corporation’s property exempt from taxation, see N.D.C.C. § 40-01-07.

Municipal industrial development bonds, exceptions, see N.D.C.C. § 40-57-13.

Municipal revenue bonds, exceptions, see N.D.C.C. § 40-35-12.

Municipal revenue refunding bonds, exceptions, see N.D.C.C. § 40-36-07.

Mutual or cooperative telephone companies subject only to gross receipts tax, see N.D.C.C. § 57-34-11.

Parking authorities, see N.D.C.C. § 40-61-14.

Surplus fund of banking association, see N.D.C.C. § 6-03-35.

Urban renewal property, see N.D.C.C. § 40-58-12.

Water conservation commission property, see N.D.C.C. § 61-02-69.